Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB394.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 79A14 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 79A14. Limitations.(a) Applicability of tax credit.--A tax credit established under this chapter may be used against the active volunteer's tax liability for the current taxable year and every year thereafter. The tax credit established under this chapter shall remain in effect until the governing body of the municipality repeals the tax credit.(b) Alternative benefit.--Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for an active volunteer who has no tax liability for the tax imposed under Chapter 3 of the Local Tax Enabling Act or for a tax imposed by a municipality on real 12345678910111213141516171819 property, the governing body of a municipality that elects to offer a tax credit established under this chapter shall determine an alternative method by which the active volunteer shall receive the full benefit of the otherwise awarded tax credit.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0394PN0359 - 2 - 123456